Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 3
NET METERING FOR CUSTOMER-GENERATORS
OF COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATIONS

40-9.5-301 to 40-9.5-306. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part repealed, p. 188, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 2002. For amendments to this part 3 prior to its repeal in 2008, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.